Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-126
Facilities; chief executive officer; appointment.

The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services shall appoint the chief executive officer of each facility referred to in section 83-107.01. Each chief executive officer shall report to the chief executive officer of the department or his or her designee and shall serve full time and without term at the pleasure of the chief executive officer of the department.

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 83;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 220;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 66;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 784.